Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.42
Contract for construction, reconstruction, remodeling, or repair of capital facility; final payment; conditions.

The Director of Administrative Services shall not issue his warrant for final payment for any contract for the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, or repair of any capital facility for any state agency or department unless there is on file in his office the certificate of a professional engineer or architect that, to the best of his knowledge, all work under the contract substantially conforms to the plans and specifications and that the contract has been fully and satisfactorily performed except for the making of the final payment.

Laws 1969, c. 772, § 5, p. 2924;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1108.07;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 35.